Washington statutes.
RCW 9.95.230

Court revocation or termination of probation.

The court shall have authority at any time prior to the entry of an order terminating probation to (1) revoke, modify, or change its order of suspension of imposition or execution of sentence; (2) it may at any time, when the ends of justice will be subserved thereby, and when the reformation of the probationer shall warrant it, terminate the period of probation, and discharge the person so held.

[ 1982 1st ex.s. c 47 s 11; 1957 c 227 s 6. Prior: 1939 c 125 s 1, part; RRS s 10249-5d.]

NOTES:

Severability—1982 1st ex.s. c 47: See note following RCW 9.41.190.

Severability—1939 c 125: See note following RCW 9.95.200.